Washington statutes.
RCW 15.60.095

Apiary coordinated areas within certain counties.

The county legislative authority of any county with a population of from forty thousand to less than seventy thousand located east of the Cascade crest and bordering in the southern side of the Snake river shall have the power to designate by an order made and published, as provided in RCW 15.60.075, certain territories as apiary coordinated areas in which they may designate the number of colonies per apiary, the distance between apiaries, the minimum required setback distance from property lines, and the time of year the regulations shall be in effect. No territory so designated shall be less than two square miles in area.

[ 2011 c 103 s 7; 1993 c 89 s 20. Formerly RCW 15.60.220.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2011 c 103: See note following RCW 15.26.120.